Hawaii, session 2025, HB1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in 1853, an estimated seventy-five per cent of the population in the Kingdom of Hawaii over the age of sixteen was literate.  By 1878, eighty per cent were literate in Hawaiian, English, or a European language, making Hawaii one of the most literate nations in the world at the time.  The department of education is committed to preserving and honoring this legacy by ensuring that all students are proficient in reading by the time they graduate. Currently, just over half of Hawaii's students are reading proficiently.  To improve student reading proficiency, it is necessary to address the root causes that contribute to the present levels of poor reading proficiency rates.  A proactive and systematic approach is required to achieve high literacy rates for all students.  Presently, the department is striving to address poor reading proficiency rates by administering a universal screener at the beginning, middle, and end of the year for all students from kindergarten to grade nine.  The purpose of this universal screening is to identify students who may be at risk for reading failure, and to provide evidence-based interventions to support these students, in addition to core-structured literacy instruction.  However, it is important to note that not all universal screeners are able to detect or identify students who may have certain underlying language challenges that impact learning.  This is problematic because students with dyslexia or other developmental language disorders may need more intensive support or a more individualized intervention program in order to address the causes of their reading challenges.  Unfortunately, Hawaii is the only state in the country that lacks dyslexia-specific laws to support students in this area. Evidence shows that students who are not identified and brought to reading proficiency by third grade face significantly lower chances of success in the future.  However, a substantial body of evidence also indicates that, with effective assessment and instruction, all students can learn to read.  This includes students with language and literacy challenges, as well as students who have dyslexia. The purposes of this Act are to support students with dyslexia and students with language and literacy challenges by requiring schools to administer department-approved dyslexia-sensitive universal screeners as a part of the universal screening process; implement evidence-based interventions for students who are identified as having dyslexia and students who are flagged as having language and literacy challenges through the Hawaii multi-tiered system of supports; provide professional development for teachers to increase implementation of structured literacy instruction; and support pre-service teacher programs in training their general and special education teacher candidates in structured literacy instruction. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding to part II, subpart C, a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-   Dyslexia-sensitve universal screening, Hawaii multi-tiered system of supports, professional development, and pre-service requirements.  (a)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, all public schools shall administer dyslexia-sensitive universal screeners approved by the department for all students in kindergarten through third grade.  The dyslexia-sensitive universal screening shall be administered as part of the established universal screening process and shall include, as developmentally appropriate, the following: (1)  Phonological and phonemic awareness; (2)  Sound-symbol recognition; (3)  Alphabet knowledge; (4)  Decoding skills; (5)  Rapid naming skills, including letter naming and letter sound fluency; (6)  Encoding skills; (7)  Oral reading accuracy and fluency; and (8)  Oral language. All public schools shall implement evidence-based interventions for students identified as having dyslexia, and for students who are flagged as struggling readers through the universal screening process.  Interventions and progress monitoring of these students should be implemented within the established Hawaii multi-tiered system of supports framework. (b)  The department shall provide professional learning opportunities for complex areas and schools on the implementation of structured literacy instruction and evidence-based interventions. (c)  The department shall collaborate with pre-service teacher programs in higher education institutions to ensure general and special education teacher candidates are trained on the implementation of structured literacy instruction to support all learners." SECTION 3.  Section 302A-101, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding five new definitions to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Dyslexia" means a specific learning disability that is neurological in origin and characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities. These difficulties typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language and literacy development that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction.  Secondary consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge. "Dyslexia-sensitive screening tool" means an assessment that measures a student's ability to demonstrate phonological and phonemic awareness, sound-symbol recognition, alphabet knowledge, decoding skills, rapid naming skills, including letter naming and letter sound fluency, encoding skills, oral reading accuracy and fluency, and accuracy of word reading on grade-level text. "Hawaii multi-tiered system of supports" means a comprehensive continuum of evidence-based, systemic practices to support a rapid response to a student's needs, with regular observation to facilitate data-based instructional decision-making. "Phonological component of language and literacy development" means the ability to recognize that a spoken word consists of a sequence of individual sounds and students possess the ability to manipulate individual sounds when speaking. "Structured literacy instruction" is an evidence-based approach, that emphasizes explicit and systematic instruction in the following components of literacy: (1)  Phonological awareness; (2)  Phonics (decoding and spelling); (3)  Fluency; (4)  Vocabulary; (5)  Comprehension; and (6)  Written expression. Unlike whole language or balanced literacy approaches, structured literacy requires detailed, step-by-step instruction that is necessary for developing strong reading and writing skills.  In addition to explicit and systematic instruction, a structured literacy approach provides multiple opportunities for students to practice a skill or strategy.  Teachers provide immediate, specific feedback to students and continuously monitor progress. "Universal screening" is the process of administering a brief standardized assessment to all students to identify those who are at risk of poor reading outcomes." SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST